New York, session 2025-2026, A2171.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 95-a of the social services law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 9 to read as follows: 3 9. (a) The department shall develop and implement a plan to ensure 4 adequate access to information by individuals who have limited English 5 proficiency or otherwise require communication assistance. Notwith- 6 standing the provisions of any general, special or local law to the 7 contrary, and subject to appropriation, the department shall: 8 (i) translate necessary documents, including but not limited to, forms 9 and instructions provided to or completed by the program beneficiaries 10 or participants, into the twelve most common non-English languages 11 spoken by individuals with limited-English proficiency in New York 12 state, based on United States census data. Pursuant to section two 13 hundred two-a of the executive law, the department may, in its 14 discretion, offer up to four additional languages beyond the twelve most 15 common languages. Such additional languages shall be determined by the 16 provisions established in such section two hundred two-a. 17 (ii) offer, upon request, interpretation services between the entity 18 administering the program and an individual in such individual's primary 19 language with respect to the provision of services or benefits; and 20 (iii) offer, upon request or demonstrated need, services to an indi- 21 vidual who requires additional assistance due to partial or total deaf- 22 ness, blindness, speech impediment, or cognitive impairment; and 23 (iv) subject to appropriation, work with the office for the aging to 24 provide additional translation services to both agencies to assist with EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04864-01-5 A. 2171 2 1 informing low-income and elderly households potentially eligible to 2 receive supplemental nutrition assistance program benefits. 3 (b) Each commissioner of social services shall retain discretion to 4 offer additional language translation services to low-income recipients, 5 as necessary. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.